Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 3. Legislature.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

26 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

38 Am. Jur. 2d, Governor, §§ 5 — 7.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 87, 90, 103 — 121.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 1(3), 70 — 74.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 43, 71, 87.

What is “public place” within requirement as to posting of election notices. 90 ALR2d 1210.

Sec. 15.40.320.
Condition and time for filling vacancy by appointment.

When a vacancy occurs in the state legislature, the governor, within 30 days, shall appoint a qualified person to fill the vacancy.
However, if the remainder of the term of the predecessor in office will expire or if a vacancy in the state senate will be filled by a special election before the legislature will next meet, convene, or reconvene, the governor may not fill the vacancy.

History.

(§ 8.51 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.330.
Qualification and confirmation of appointee.

The appointee shall meet the qualifications of a member of the legislature as prescribed in art. II, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and, if the predecessor in office was a member of a political party or political group at the time of the vacancy, (1) shall be a member of the same political party or political group as the predecessor in office; and (2) shall be subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature who are members of the same political party or political group as the predecessor in office and of the same house as was the predecessor in office. If the predecessor in office was not a member of a political party or political group at the time of the vacancy, or, if no other member of the predecessor’s political party or political group is a member of the predecessor’s house of the legislature, the governor may appoint any qualified person. If the appointee is not a member of a political party or political group, as provided in (b) of this section, the appointment is not subject to confirmation. If the appointee is a member of a political party or political group, the appointment is subject to confirmation as provided by (b) of this section for the confirmation of political party or political group appointees.

A member of a political party or political group is a person who supports the political program of a political party or political group. The absence of a political party or political group designation after a candidate's name on an election ballot does not preclude a candidate from being a member of a political party or political group. Recognition of a candidate as a member of a political party or political group caucus of members of the legislature at the legislative session following the election of the candidate is recognition of that person’s political party or political group membership for the purposes of confirmation under this section.

History.

(§ 8.52 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 168 ch 100 SLA 1980; § 55, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A candidate appointed by the governor to fill a vacated state senate seat was rejected by vote of the members of the departing senator’s party at a closed-door meeting held without notice of the time or place of the meeting. In the absence of such notice, there could be no proper action on the appointment. Further, the vote must take place in open session, and until such a vote is taken, the governor is free to appoint a candidate under AS

15.40.320

. 2009 Op. Alaska Att’y Gen. (April 18, 2009).

Sec. 15.40.340.
Date of office of appointee.

If the appointment is not subject to confirmation, the term of the appointee shall begin on the first day the appointee is present when the legislature meets, convenes, or reconvenes after the date of the appointment.
If the appointment is subject to confirmation, the term of the appointee shall begin on the date the appointment is confirmed.

History.

(§ 8.53 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.350.
Procedure upon rejection.

If an appointment is rejected, the governor, within 10 days, shall appoint another qualified person as provided in AS

15.40.330

, who shall also be subject to confirmation, as provided in that section.

History.

(§ 8.54 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.360.
Term of appointed representative.

If the vacancy is in the state house of representatives, the appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History.

(§ 8.55 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.370.
Conditions for full, unexpired term senate appointment.

If the vacancy is for an unexpired senate term of two years plus five full calendar months or less, the appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

History.

(§ 8.56 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.40.380.
Conditions for part-term senate appointment and special election.

If the vacancy is for an unexpired senate term of more than two years and five full calendar months, the governor shall call a special primary election and a special election by proclamation and the appointment shall expire on the date the state senate first convenes or reconvenes following the certification of the results of the special election by the director.

History.

(§ 8.57 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 169 ch 100 SLA 1980; § 56, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, inserted “primary election and a special” following “shall call a special”.

Sec. 15.40.390.
Date of special primary election and special election.

The special primary election to fill a vacancy in the state senate shall be held on the date of the first primary election held more than 60 days after the senate vacancy occurs, and the special election shall be held on the date of the first general election thereafter.

History.

(§ 8.58 ch 83 SLA 1960; § 57, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “The special election to fill a vacancy in the state senate shall be held on the date of the first general election held more than three full calendar months after the senate vacancy occurs.”

Sec. 15.40.400.
Proclamation of special primary election and special election.

The governor shall issue the proclamation calling the special primary election and special election at least 50 days before the special primary election.

History.

(§ 8.59 ch 83 SLA 1960; § 58, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, inserted “special primary election and” following “proclamation calling the” and “special primary” following “50 days before the”.

Sec. 15.40.410.
Term of elected senator.

At the special election a state senator shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired term and shall take office on the date the state senate first convenes or reconvenes following the certification of the results of the special election by the director.

History.

(§ 8.60 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 170 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.40.420.
Selection of nominees in manner provided for general election.

If the vacancy in the office of state senator occurs one calendar month or more before the filing date for the primary election, candidates for the special election shall be nominated in the manner provided for the nomination of candidates for general elections.

History.

(§ 8.61 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 34 ch 69 SLA 1970)

Sec. 15.40.430.
Designation of nominees by petition.

If the vacancy occurs less than one calendar month before the filing date and more than three calendar months before the next general election, candidates shall be nominated by petition transmitted by actual physical delivery of the petition in person or by mail postmarked not later than midnight of the filing date.

History.

(§ 8.62 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 21 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 171 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 52 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, deleted the (1) and (2) designations, deleted "; or (3) by telegram or a copy in substance of the statements made in the petition to the director before September 2 just before the special election" at the end, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 15.40.440.
Requirements of petition for candidates.

Petitions for the nomination of candidates must be executed under oath, state in substance that which is required in a declaration of candidacy under AS

15.25.030

, and include the fee required under AS

15.25.050(a)

.

History.

(§ 8.63 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 172 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 58 SLA 1995; am § 54 ch 21 SLA 2000; § 59, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, “Petitions for the nomination of candidates not representing a political party shall be signed by qualified voters equal in number to at least one percent of the number of voters who cast ballots in the proposed nominee’s respective house or senate district in the preceding general election. A nominating petition may not contain less than 50 signatures for any district, and must state in substance that which is required in petitions for nomination by AS

15.25.180

.”

Sec. 15.40.450.
Requirements of petition by political party.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.460.
Selection of political party nominees.

History.

[Repealed, § 72, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2 SLA 2020.]

Sec. 15.40.470.
General provision for conduct of the special primary election and special election.

Unless specifically provided otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the primary election and general election shall govern the conduct of the special primary election and special election of state senators, including provisions concerning voter qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of municipalities; provision for notification of the election; provision for payment of election expenses; provisions regarding employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the counting, reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of the votes and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and provision for absentee voting.

History.

(§ 8.66 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 6 2004 Ballot Measure No. 4; am § 8 ch 50 SLA 2004; § 60, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, inserted “primary election and” following “regarding the conduct of” and “primary election and special” following “conduct of the special”.